Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201685-2102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Access College Early Scholarship Program Act:

(1) Career program of study means a sequence of at least three high school courses that (a) may include dual-credit or college credit courses, (b) are part of a career pathway program of study aligned with (i) the rules and regulations of the State Department of Education adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 79-777, (ii) a professional certification requirement, or (iii) the requirements for a postsecondary certification or diploma, and (c) have at least one local member of business or industry partnering as an official advisor to the program;

(2) Commission means the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education;

(3) Extreme hardship means any event, including fire, illness, accident, or job loss, that has recently resulted in a significant financial difficulty for a student or the student's parent or legal guardian;

(4) Postsecondary educational institution means a two-year or four-year college or university which is a member institution of an accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education;

(5) Qualified postsecondary educational institution means a postsecondary educational institution located in Nebraska which has agreed, on a form developed and provided by the commission, to comply with the requirements of the act; and

(6) Student means a student attending a Nebraska high school with a reasonable expectation that such student will meet the residency requirements of section 85-502 upon graduation from a Nebraska high school.

Laws 2007, LB192, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB525, § 33.